District of Columbia statutes.
34-218

“Telegraph corporation” defined.

The term “telegraph corporation” when used in this subtitle includes every corporation, company, association, joint-stock company or association, partnership, and person, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, owning, operating, controlling, or managing any plant, wires, poles, or property for the purposes of communication, or of transmitting or receiving messages by telegraph, or by any telegraphic apparatus or instrument, or any telegraph line or part of telegraph line used in the conduct of the business of affording for hire, communication by telegraph, or which licenses, lets, or permits telegraphic communication for hire.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
1981 Ed., § 43-219.
1973 Ed., § 43-119.